Maryland, session 2025, SB0567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–607.
(c) (1) A commissioner shall receive applications and determine probable
cause for the issuance of charging documents.
(2) A commissioner shall advise arrested persons of their constitutional
rights, set bond or commit persons to jail in default of bond or release them on personal
recognizance if circumstances warrant, and conduct investigations and inquiries into the
circumstances of any matter presented to the commissioner in order to determine if
probable cause exists for the issuance of a charging document, warrant, or criminal
summons and, in general, perform all the functions of committing magistrates as exercised
by the justices of the peace prior to July 5, 1971.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0567*

SENATE BILL 567
(3) There shall be in each county, at all times, one or more commissioners
available for the convenience of the public and police in obtaining charging documents,
warrants, or criminal summonses and to advise arrested persons of their rights as required
by law.
(4) A commissioner may exercise the powers of office in any county to which
the commissioner is assigned by the Chief Judge of the District Court or a designee of the
Chief Judge of the District Court.
(5) The Chief Judge of the District Court may authorize one or more
commissioners to perform the duties of a commissioner regarding persons arrested in a
county other than the county in which the commissioner resides and for which the
commissioner was appointed when the arrested persons are brought before the
commissioner by a peace officer of the jurisdiction in which that arrest was made.
(6) (i) An individual may file an application for a statement of charges
with a District Court commissioner.
(ii) On review of an application for a statement of charges, a District
Court commissioner may issue a summons or an arrest warrant.
(iii) A District Court commissioner may issue an arrest warrant only
on a finding that:
1. There is probable cause to believe that the defendant
committed the offense charged in the charging document; [and]
2. THE INDIVIDUAL FILING THE APPLICATION FOR A
STATEMENT OF CHARGES IS A POLICE OFFICER AS DEFINED IN § 3–201 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE OR A STATE’S ATTORNEY; AND
[2.] 3. A. The defendant previously has failed to respond to a
summons that has been personally served or a citation;
B. The whereabouts of the defendant are unknown and the
issuance of a warrant is necessary to subject the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court;
C. The defendant is in custody for another offense; or
D. There is probable cause to believe that the defendant poses
a danger to another person or to the community.
(iv) On a finding of good cause, a judge of the District Court or a judge
of a circuit court may recall an arrest warrant issued by a District Court commissioner
under this paragraph and issue a summons in its place.

SENATE BILL 567 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.